Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish a pilot
program at Portland State University and Eastern Oregon University to  enhance the hiring
of public university students by eligible nonprofit organizations.
(2) Under the pilot program:
(a) One or more individuals designated as pilot  program administrators at each partic-
ipating public university shall register:
(A) Enrolled students at the participating public  university who wish to participate in the
pilot program; and
(B) Eligible nonprofit organizations that wish to participate in the pilot program;
(b) The pilot  program administrators shall match students who register under paragraph
(a)(A) of this subsection with eligible nonprofit organizations that register under paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection and shall match each student, to the degree  practicable, with an
organization that operates in a field relevant to the student’s course of study;
(c) The eligible nonprofit  organization shall employ each student that it is matched with
for between 10 and 20 hours per week;
(d) The eligible nonprofit  organization shall pay each employed student wages at an
hourly rate not less than the Oregon minimum wage; and
(e) For each academic term in which a student is employed by  an eligible nonprofit or-
ganization under this section, the student’s cost of tuition at the participating public uni-
versity shall be reduced by 20 percent.
(3) If a student who is  employed by an eligible nonprofit organization under the pilot
program stops working for the organization during an academic term:
(a) The student shall  continue to receive the discounted tuition described in subsection
(2)(e) of this section for that academic term; and
(b) The student may not participate  in the pilot program during the following academic
term.
(4) Each  participating public university shall adopt policies relating to the administration
of the pilot program, including but not limited to:
(a) How enrolled students and eligible nonprofit organizations can apply to participate  in
the pilot program;
Enrolled House Bill 2802 (HB 2802-A) Page 1
(b) The number of enrolled students and eligible nonprofit organizations that can partic-
ipate in the pilot program during each academic term; and
(c) Subject to subsection  (5)(b) of this section, the rate at which the wages paid to stu-
dents by eligible nonprofit organizations under this section will be subsidized.
(5) Participating public universities may  use moneys appropriated by the Legislative As-
sembly for the purposes of conducting the pilot program:
(a) To offset the reduction  in tuition moneys received by participating public universities
resulting from the participating public universities’ participation in the pilot program;
(b) To reimburse eligible nonprofit organizations that  participate in the pilot program no
more than 50 percent of the amount the eligible nonprofit organizations paid  in wages to
students who participate in the pilot program; and
(c) For expenses incurred by participating public universities in administering  the pilot
program.
(6) No later  than September 15 of each year, each participating public university shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program  described in this section and submit, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, a  report on the results of the evaluation to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible nonprofit organization” means an organization that:
(A) Is a not-for-profit  corporation that is tax exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(B) Has an annual budget of $5,000,000 or less.
(b) “Participating public university” means:
(A) Portland State University; or
(B) Eastern Oregon University.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $294,206, to be allocated to Portland State
University and Eastern Oregon University for the purpose of conducting the pilot  program
established by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 2802 (HB 2802-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2802 (HB 2802-A) Page 3